Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3435.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 13-113 of Title 26, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Every municipal bond proposal to be voted on by the citizens
of that municipality shall contain only one subject and the subject
shall be expressed and defined in its ballot title.
B. Multiple bond proposals shall be permitted to be on the same
ballot, provided they require separate votes to be cast.
C. A bond proposal may violate this act if the monies raised
through the bond are appropriated and spent by more than a single
ENGR. H. B. NO. 3435 Page 1

agen cy, department, or director within the municipality unless
otherwise provided for in the ballot proposal. Nothing in this
section shall prevent funds from being transferred to another
department, director, or agency within the municipality, provided
that the funds are used for the project contained within the bond
proposal.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
Passed the House of Representatives the 11th day of March, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the _______ day of __________, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the Senate









ENGR. H. B. NO. 3435 Page 2